Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.700

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 11.130.705 through 11.130.755 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Disability" means, with respect to an individual, a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities.

(2) "Supported decision-making agreement" is an agreement between an adult with a disability and one or more supporters entered into under this chapter.

(3) "Supporter" means an adult who has entered into a supported decision-making agreement with an adult with a disability.

[ 2020 c 312 s 601.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.